en: Raw Puff pastry
fr: Pâte feuilletée crue à la matière grasse végétale

en: Frozen raw puff pastry
fr: Pâte feuilletée surgelée crue

en: Frozen raw puff pastry with pure butter
fr: Pâte feuilletée pur beurre surgelée crue

en: Phyllo dough raw, Filo dough raw
fr: Pâte phyllo crue, Pâte filo crue

en: Frozen phyllo dough, Frozen filo dough
fr: Pâte phyllo surgelée, Pâte filo surgelée

en: Tajine
fr: Tajine, tagine
hr: Tajine
nl: Tajine
ro: Tajine

en: Mutton tagine
fr: Tajine de mouton
hr: Ovčetina tagine
nl: Tajine met schapenvlees

en: Vegetarian tajine with side dishes
fr: Tajines végétariens avec accompagnements

en: Endives with ham, Endive with ham, Chicory with ham
fr: Endives au jambon, Endive au jambon
hr: Endivija sa šunkom
nl: Witloof met hesp, Witloof met ham
ro: Andive cu șuncă

en: Vegetable puff pastries, Vegetable puff pastry
fr: Feuilletés aux légumes
hr: Lisnato pecivo od povrća
nl: Soesjes met groente

en: Puff pastries with ham and cheese, puff pastry with ham and cheese, Ham and cheese in puffed pastry
fr: Feuilletés jambon fromage, Feuilleté jambon fromage
hr: Lisnato pecivo sa šunkom i sirom
nl: Ham-kaas-soesjes

en: Fish or seafood in puff pastry
fr: Feuilleté au poisson et/ou fruits de mer

en: Khatfa, Phyllo pastry, Filo pastry
fr: Khatfa

en: Banh Bao
fr: Banh Bao (Pain brioché farci)
hr: Banh bao
ja: バインバオ

en: Samosas, sambusa, samboksa, Samoosas
de: Samosas
es: Samosas
fi: Samosat, Samoosat
fr: Samoussas, samossas, samosas
hr: Samose
ja: サモサ
nl: Samosa

en: Samoussas with poultry
fr: Samoussas à la volaille, samossas à la volaille
hr: Samousse s peradi
nl: Gevogelte samosa

en: Chicken samosas, Samoussas with chicken
fr: Samoussas au poulet, samossas au poulet

en: Beef samosas
fr: Samoussas au bœuf, samossas au bœuf
hr: Goveđe samose
nl: Rundvleessamosa

en: Cheese samosas
fr: Samoussas au fromage, samossas au fromage

en: Pork samosas
fr: Samoussas au porc, samossas au porc
hr: Svinjske samose
nl: Varkensvleessamosa